Vermont statutes. Title 22 Libraries, History, and Information Technology
Chapter 5. Vermont Historical Society

§ 281.
Members and trustees ex officio.

The Secretary of State and the State Librarian, by virtue of their offices, shall be members of the Vermont Historical Society and of the Board of Trustees thereof.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 80

, § 1;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 17.

§ 282.
Director.

Subject to the final approval of the Governor, the Board of Trustees shall employ and determine the salary of the Director of the Society.

The Director shall have charge of the collections of the Society and such historical objects, books, and documents of the State as shall be placed therewith for use.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 80

, § 2;

1987, No. 7

.

§ 283.
Expenditure of funds.

The sums annually available for the Society shall be expended by the Director under the general supervision of the president for the purchase of books, pamphlets, manuscripts, and museum items relating particularly to the history of Vermont and for such other historical material as may be deemed best, for the publication of its proceedings and other matters of historical importance, for the payment of the salary of the Director and the salaries of other employees of the Society, for procuring portraits of deceased Governors and Lieutenant Governors not now possessed by the State, and for binding and preserving documents and other property of the Society.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 80

, § 3.

§ 284.
Disposition of books, collections, and property.

If the Society is ever dissolved, the books, collections, and property thereof shall become the property of the State.
Such Society shall not sell or dispose of any part of its books or collections, except by way of exchange or to further the objects of the Society and then only upon the vote of the Board of Trustees of the Society.
Any sale or disposal thereof contrary to the provisions of this section shall be void.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 80

, § 4.

§ 285.
Classification of employees.

Employees of the Vermont Historical Society shall be classified by the State classification system as if they were State employees and shall receive all general pay increases granted State employees.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 137

, § 1; amended

1973, No. 37

, § 4.

§ 286.
Repealed.
1973, No. 37, § 5.